West Virginia, session 2025, HB3010.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONSIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. §49-2-131. Subsidized child care for employees of child care programs. The department shall subsidize child care programs, including family child care homes, within the state for providing child care services to children of child care program employees who work a minimum of 20 hours per week, regardless of income.